Nebraska, session 109, LB654.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB654 LB654
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $300,000 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $300,000 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Department of Agriculture, for Program 78, for state
aid.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program
$300,000 General Funds for FY2025-26 and $300,000 General Funds for
FY2026-27, for purposes of purchasing assistive technology and equipment
for farmers and ranchers pursuant to the Nebraska AgrAbility program
which does not otherwise qualify for funding by the United States
Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-